Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CURSIVE HANDWRITING.new text end new text begin The commissioner of education must develop an elementary English language arts model curriculum that is designed to enable students to develop legible cursive handwriting skills by the end of grade 5. The commissioner must include instructional materials in the model curriculum. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education for grants to school districts to adopt a cursive handwriting curriculum. new text end